Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,110.05
Geriatric parole; eligibility; conditions; term.

(1) A committed offender may be eligible for geriatric parole if the committed offender:

(a) Is not serving a sentence for a Class I, IA, or IB felony; is not serving a sentence for an offense that includes as an element sexual contact or sexual penetration; and is not otherwise serving a sentence of life imprisonment;

(b) Is seventy-five years of age or older; and

(c) Has served at least fifteen years of the sentence for which currently incarcerated.

(2) A committed offender may be eligible for geriatric parole in addition to any other parole. The department shall identify committed offenders who may be eligible for geriatric parole.

(3) The board shall decide to grant geriatric parole only after a review of the decision guidelines as set forth in the board's rules and regulations and the factors set forth in section 83-1,114.

(4) The parole term of a geriatric parolee shall be for the remainder of the parolee's sentence as reduced by any adjustment for good conduct pursuant to the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act.

(5) The board shall require as a condition of geriatric parole that the parolee wear or use an electronic monitoring device for a period of at least eighteen months. For purposes of this subsection, electronic monitoring device means a device worn by or affixed to a person which is used to track the physical location of such person.

Laws 2023, LB50, § 48.

The new parole eligibility provisions added by sections 47, 48, and 57 of 2023 Neb. Laws, L.B. 50, are not unconstitutional commutations as they do not result in substituting a milder punishment for the sentence originally imposed. State ex rel. Hilgers v. Evnen, 318 Neb. 803, 19 N.W.3d 244 (2025).